fi: Kiven muoto: Sydän; Kuusikulmainen; markiisi; Soikea; Päärynä; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Kyynel; Kolmion muotoinen; Muu
hr-HR: Oblik kamena: Srce; Šesterokutni; Markizni; Ovalni; Kruška; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Suza; Trokutasti; Ostalo
zh-CN: 石头形状: 心; 六角形; 女侯爵; 椭圆形; 梨; 矩形; 圆头; 方形; 泪滴状; 三角形; 其他
da: Stenform: Hjerte; Hexagonal; Marquise; Oval; Pære; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkant; Tåre; Trekantet; Andet
es: Forma de la piedra: Corazón; Hexagonal; Marquesa; Ovalado; Pera; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Lágrima; Triangular; Otros
tr: Taş şekli: Kalp; Altıgen şeklinde; Markiz; Oval; Armut; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Gözyaşı; Üçgen şekilli; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar kameňa: Srdcový; Šesťhranný; Markíza; Oválny; Hruškový; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Slzný; Trojuholníkový; Iné
ja: 石の形: ハート; 六角; マーキス; 楕円形; 洋梨; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; ティアドロップ; 三角形; その他
ko: 돌 모양: 하트; 육방정계; 마르퀴즈; 타원형; 배; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 티어드롭; 삼각형; 기타
pt-PT: Formato de pedra: Coração; Hexagonal; Marquesa; Oval; Pera; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Em forma de lágrima; Triangular; Outro
el: Σχήμα πέτρας: Καρδιά; Εξαγώνιος; Μαρκησία; Οβάλ; Αχλάδι; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Δάκρυ; Τριγωνική; Άλλο
ro-RO: Forma pietrei: Inimă; Hexagonală; Marchiz; Ovală; Pară; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Pătrat; Lacrimă; Triunghiulară; Altele
th: รูปร่างของหิน: หัวใจ; แบบหกเหลี่ยม; ทรงมาร์คี; รูปไข่; ทรงลูกแพร์; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; หยดน้ำตา; แนวสามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 石頭形狀: 心; 六角形; 馬眼鑽石; 橢圓形; 梨形; 長方形; 圓頭; 方頭; 淚珠; 三角形; 其他
pt-BR: Forma de pedra: Coração; Hexagonal; Marquesa; Oval; Pera; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Mini-trailer; Triangular; Outro
hu: Kő alakja: Szív; Hatszögletű; Marquise; Ovális; Körte alakú; Téglalap; Kerek; Négyzet; Könnycsepp; Háromszögletű; Egyéb
nb: Steinform: Hjerte; Heksagonal; Marquise; Oval; Pære; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Teardrop; Trekantet; Annet
vi: Hình dạng đá: Trái tim; Lục phương; Hình thoi dài; Hình trái xoan; Lê; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Nhỏ gọn; Tam giác; Khác
en: Stone shape: Heart; Hexagonal; Marquise; Oval; Pear; Rectangular; Round; Square; Teardrop; Triangular; Other
ru: Форма камня: Сердце; Шестиугольный; Маркиза; Овальный; Грушевидный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Квадратный; Каплевидный; Треугольный; Другое
sv: Stenform: Hjärta; Hexagonal; Marquise; Oval; Päron; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Teardrop; Triangulär; Övrigt
it: Forma della pietra: Cuore; Esagonale; Marchesa; Ovale; Pera; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; Goccia; Triangolare; Altro
bg-BG: Форма на камък: Сърце; Шестоъгълен; Овален с камък; Овален; Круша; Правоъгълен; Кръгъл; Квадратен; Teardrop; Триъгълен; Други
nl: Steenvorm: Hart; Zeshoekig; Marquise; Ovaal; Peer; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Traan; Driehoekig; Andere
de: Steinform: Herz; Sechseckig; Marquise; Oval; Birne; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadrat; Träne; Dreieckig; Sonstiges
cs: Tvar kamene: Srdce; Šestiúhelník; Markýza; Oválný; Hruška; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Čtvercová; Slza; Trojúhelníkový; Jiné
fr: Forme de pierre: Cœur; Hexagonal; Marquise; Oval; Poire; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Mini-caravane; Triangulaire; Autre
lt-LT: Akmens forma: Širdelių forma; Šešiakampis; Markizė; Ovalas; Kriaušės forma; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratas; Lašo forma; Trikampis; Kita
pl: Kształt kamienia: Serce; Sześciokątna; Markiza; Owalny; Gruszka; Prostokątna; Runda; Kwadrat; Łza; Trójkątny; Inne
sl-SI: Oblika kamna: Srce; Šestkoten; Markiza; Ovalno; Hruška; Pravokotno; Okrogel; Kvadratna; Kaplja; Trikotna; Drugo